Utah statutes.
10-19-201.   Target amount of qualifying electricity -- Renewable energy
certificate -- Cost-effectiveness.
(1) (a)  To the extent that it is cost-effective to do so, beginning in 2025
the annual retail electric sales in this state of each municipal electric
utility shall consist of qualifying electricity or renewable energy
certificates in an amount equal to at least 20% of adjusted retail electric
sales.
(b)  The amount under Subsection (1)(a) is computed based upon adjusted retail
sales for the calendar year commencing 36 months before the first day of the
year for which the target calculated under Subsection (1)(a) applies.
(c)  Notwithstanding Subsections (1)(a) and (b) an increase in the annual
target from one year to the next is limited to the greater of:
(i)  17,500 megawatt-hours; or
(ii)  20% of the prior year's amount under Subsections (1)(a) and (b).
(2)  Cost-effectiveness under Subsection (1) is determined using any criteria
applicable to the municipal electric utility's acquisition of a significant
energy resource established by the municipality's legislative body.
(3)  This section does not require a municipal electric utility to:
(a)  substitute qualifying electricity for electricity from a generation
source owned or contractually committed, or from a contractual commitment for
a power purchase;
(b)  enter into any additional electric sales commitment or any other
arrangement for the sale or other disposition of electricity that is not
already, or would not be, entered into by the municipal electric utility; or
(c)  acquire qualifying electricity in excess of its adjusted retail electric
sales.
(4)  A municipal electrical corporation may combine the following to meet
Subsection (1):
(a)  qualifying electricity from a renewable energy source owned by the
municipal electric utility;
(b)  qualifying electricity acquired by the municipal electric utility through
trade, power purchase, or other transfer; and
(c)  a bundled or unbundled renewable energy certificate, including a banked
renewable energy certificate.
(5)  To meet Subsection (1), a municipal electric utility may also count:
(a)  qualifying electricity generated or acquired or renewable energy
certificates acquired for a program permitting the municipal electric
utility's customers to voluntarily contribute to a renewable energy source;
and
(b)  electricity allocated to this state that is produced by a hydroelectric
facility becoming operational after December 31, 2007 if the hydroelectric
facility is located in any state in which the municipal electric utility, or
the interlocal entity with which the municipal electric utility has a
contract, provides electric service.
